Utah statutes.
63G-2-803.   No individual liability for certain decisions of a governmental
entity.
(1)  Neither the governmental entity, nor any officer or employee of the
governmental entity, is liable for damages resulting from the release of a
record where the person or government requesting the record presented evidence
of authority to obtain the record even if it is subsequently determined that
the requester had no authority.
(2)  Neither the governmental entity, nor any officer or employee of the
governmental entity, is liable for damages arising from the negligent
disclosure of records classified as private under Subsection 63G-2-302(1)(f)
unless:
(a)  the disclosure was of employment records maintained by the governmental
entity; or
(b)  the current or former government employee had previously filed the notice
required by Section 63G-2-303 and:
(i)  the government entity did not take reasonable steps to preclude access or
distribution of the record; or
(ii)  the release of the record was otherwise willfully or grossly negligent.
(3)  A mailing from a government agency to an individual who has filed an
application under Section 63G-2-303 is not a wrongful disclosure under this
chapter or under Title 63A, Chapter 12, Archives and Records Service.
